California, session 20252026, AB499.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 100235 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:100235. (a) The department shall annually reimburse the Robert F. Kennedy Farm Workers Medical Plan for claim payments that exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) made by the plan on behalf of an eligible employee or dependent for a single episode of care on or after September 1, 2016. This reimbursement shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) per year.(b) To seek reimbursement, commencing after September 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, the plan shall submit to the department completed data, verified by an independent certified public accountant, for claims paid by the plan for services during the preceding year from September 1 to August 31, inclusive.(c) (1) If the department receives claims data from the plan pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall analyze that data to determine the aggregate amount of claims that exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) paid by the plan on behalf of an eligible employee or dependent for any single episode of care.(2) No later than 60 days after the department receives claims data submitted by the plan, the department shall reimburse the plan the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1), up to the amount of three million dollars ($3,000,000) per year.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.